South Dakota, session 2026, SB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 43-32-24 be AMENDED:
43-32-24. Every lessor of residential premises shall, within twenty-one days after
the termination of the tenancy and receipt of the tenant's mailing address or delivery
instructions, return the security deposit described in § 43-32-6.1 to the tenant or furnish
to the tenant a written statement showing the specific reason for withholding the deposit,
or any portion of the deposit. The lessor may withhold from the deposit only the amounts
reasonably necessary to:
(1) Remedy tenant defaults in the payment of:
(a) Rent; and
(b) Other funds due to the landlord pursuant to an agreement; and
(2) Restore the premises to their condition at the commencement of the tenancy,
ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Within forty-five days after termination of the tenancy, upon request of the lessee,
the lessor must provide the lessee with an itemized accounting of any deposit withheld.
Any lessor of residential premises who fails to comply with this section forfeits all
rights to withhold any portion of the deposit.
The bad faith retention of a deposit, or any portion of a deposit, by a lessor of
residential premises, in violation of this section, or the bad faith failure to provide the
written statement or itemized accounting, as required by this section, subjects the lessor
to punitive damages not to exceed two hundred dollars.

26.35.23 2 4
An Act to revise procedures for returning and withholding security deposits for residential
premises.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 4
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 4 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB4 ENROLLED